public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.dic
inakuar/A
ralegrar/A
analiđar/A
apaltar/A
arkar/A
asar/A
inaŧidar/A
axevolar/A
bagaɉar/A
bakajar/A
inbalegar/A
balsamar/A
xbandir/A
xbaporar/A
inbarbotar/A
xbarufar/A
xbàter/A
inbaukar/A
baxnar/A
bekonar/A
bersajar/A
bevaŧar/A
biasugar/A
skonbinar/A
subisar/A
bixigolar/A
xbóɉer/A
inbokonar/A
abonar/A
sorabondar/A
bordiđar/A
dexbotir/A
dexboŧar/A
dexbragesar/A
brankar/A
bravar/A
brikonar/A
inbrojar/A
xbroentar/A
brunir/A
bufar/A
inbusolotar/A
buxnar/A
carir/A
cekar/A
ocèñer/A
recéñer/A
cilar/A
conbar/A
indafarar/A
dedegar/A
depénxer/A
dexinar/A
dexdíxer/A
indogar/A
domenar/A
indopionar/A
adotar/A
indubitar/A
inđalar/A
đogar/A
sorađónxer/A
ebraiđar/A
enpir/A
esir/A
exasperar/A
far/A
torefar/A
fakinar/A
sfalsar/A
infantar/A
fatuar/A
anplifegar/A
paxifegar/A
efeltrir/A
ferar/A
inferetar/A
sfetar/A
infiankir/A
desfibrar/A
figurar/A
tranfilar/A
infiokar/A
fisar/A
dexafitar/A
desfodrar/A
sfojar/A
refónder/A
konfortar/A
informigolar/A
infosar/A
sfranpuñar/A
fraskar/A
fraŧionar/A
sfregolar/A
infrisar/A
frular/A
sfugaŧar/A
furbir/A
fuxir/A
galantejar/A
ingaluŧar/A
xgangolir/A
xgarbelar/A
xgarofolar/A
ingaxiar/A
glutinar/A
ingonbrar/A
ingoŧar/A
gramolar/A
dexgranelar/A
ingrapeɉar/A
ingravar/A
dexgrendenar/A
xgrinfar/A
xgriŧar/A
ingropar/A
guar/A
guarir/A
xguilŧar/A
inguxelar/A
indasenar/A
infioketar/A
inpiñatar/A
insotar/A
intrajar/A
tranxitar/A
inɉandolir/A
dexɉemar/A
inɉòter/A
kair/A
deskaenaŧar/A
kalafatar/A
kalkiđolar/A
deskalŧar/A
inkamufar/A
kontrakanbiar/A
inkankrenir/A
deskantar/A
kapir/A
kaponar/A
karamelar/A
inkargar/A
deskaroñar/A
inkartelar/A
kasegar/A
katalogar/A
deskatramar/A
kautar/A
skavaleŧar/A
kaxermar/A
koatar/A
arkòjer/A
deskokonar/A
deskolorir/A
rekomandar/A
inkomodar/A
skonéter/A
konpir/A
konóser/A
deskontentar/A
konvojar/A
akorar/A
deskoraɉir/A
inkòrđer/A
inkorniđar/A
kosar/A
skotolar/A
kòxer/A
inkrespar/A
krikolar/A
krostar/A
inkroŧolar/A
kuadriđar/A
kuentar/A
deskuinternar/A
deskular/A
rekuñar/A
inkurvar/A
kuxinar/A
xlanguir/A
delapidar/A
xlatar/A
xlavinar/A
relegar/A
lesar/A
xlevar/A
paraliđar/A
likuidar/A
lisegar/A
traxlokar/A
xlongar/A
xloxar/A
stralunar/A
luxingar/A
inmagaxenar/A
maliñar/A
demandar/A
manganar/A
mañar/A
marcar/A
marɉiar/A
marxinar/A
xmaskarar/A
matonar/A
maŧipar/A
remediar/A
mejorar/A
menaŧar/A
xmenuŧar/A
meritar/A
inprométer/A
reméter/A
migrar/A
xminuŧar/A
mitigar/A
xmokar/A
mòlđer/A
montar/A
mónxer/A
morbidir/A
inmorsar/A
xmorŧar/A
promòver/A
mudarar/A
multar/A
inmusar/A
mutolir/A
xnanarar/A
nauxear/A
inegrir/A
nikar/A
nodrigar/A
denotar/A
inuvolir/A
ñiñolar/A
odorar/A
okupar/A
inonbrar/A
onorar/A
inorbar/A
inorkar/A
dexosar/A
manovrar/A
pair/A
strapagar/A
palar/A
inpalidir/A
spalpuñar/A
despanocar/A
paoniđar/A
inparar/A
sparecar/A
despartir/A
partorir/A
inpaxetar/A
pastrocar/A
espatriar/A
paŧientar/A
inpavionar/A
strapegar/A
spelacar/A
inpenir/A
depénđer/A
pensar/A
inpeocar/A
periodar/A
perpetrar/A
pestuñar/A
despetenar/A
inpetrir/A
piadeđar/A
renpiànđer/A
inpicinar/A
inpikar/A
pinŧar/A
piòver/A
pironar/A
pitufar/A
plakar/A
replikar/A
spolpar/A
pomegar/A
inpóner/A
inpontar/A
repopolar/A
spostar/A
pregar/A
reprexentar/A
provar/A
desputar/A
dexradixar/A
ranɉar/A
skoraŧar/A
xregolar/A
rexíster/A
roar/A
inrokir/A
ropetar/A
rufar/A
inruxenir/A
sakramentar/A
saludar/A
satiriđar/A
scopetar/A
segregar/A
konsejar/A
insensar/A
desepelir/A
sevitar/A
trasimar/A
situar/A
skarpiar/A
skermar/A
deskorŧar/A
skurir/A
insolentar/A
sopir/A
spalmar/A
spendacar/A
spiferar/A
spojar/A
sputanar/A
starnudar/A
istekir/A
institikir/A
strafuñar/A
strepitar/A
strukonar/A
stupinar/A
susultar/A
destabarar/A
destakar/A
tapar/A
intaskar/A
intelerar/A
destenperar/A
teñir/A
mantèñer/A
interar/A
protèxer/A
toir/A
tonfar/A
stornar/A
astràer/A
tramacar/A
trateđar/A
intresar/A
trivelar/A
tuar/A
ŧapegar/A
ŧentraliđar/A
desŧervelar/A
ŧinkuantar/A
ŧopegar/A
urmar/A
vageɉar/A
soravanŧar/A
revéder/A
vénder/A
dexveñir/A
pervèñer/A
verigolar/A
verxurar/A
dexvidar/A
dexviscar/A
invodar/A
dexvoltar/A
inxakolar/A
xborñar/A
suxerir/A
xmerejar/A
exultar/A
